Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6610
Reports.

(1) On or before October 31 of each year, the Department of Economic Development and the Department of Revenue shall electronically submit an annual report to the Legislature. At a minimum, the report shall include the following information regarding tax credits and the recipients of such credits:

(a) The aggregate number of pounds, and a list of each type, of renewable chemicals produced in Nebraska by all recipients (i) during the calendar year prior to the calendar year for which each recipient first received tax credits and (ii) for each calendar year thereafter;

(b) The aggregate sales of all renewable chemicals produced by all recipients in each calendar year for which there are at least five recipients;

(c) The aggregate number of pounds, and a list of each type, of biomass feedstock used in the production of renewable chemicals in Nebraska by all recipients (i) during the calendar year prior to the calendar year for which each recipient first received tax credits and (ii) for each calendar year thereafter;

(d) The number of employees located in Nebraska of all recipients (i) during the calendar year prior to the calendar year for which each recipient first received tax credits and (ii) for each calendar year thereafter;

(e) The number and aggregate amount of tax credits issued for each calendar year;

(f) The number of eligible businesses placed on the wait list for each calendar year and the total number of eligible businesses remaining on the wait list at the end of that calendar year;

(g) The dollar amount of tax credit claims placed on the wait list for each calendar year and the total dollar amount of tax credit claims remaining on the wait list at the end of that calendar year;

(h) For each eligible business which received tax credits during each calendar year: (i) The identity of the eligible business; (ii) the amount of the tax credits; and (iii) the manner in which the eligible business first qualified as an eligible business, whether by organizing, expanding, or locating in the state; and

(i) The total amount of all tax credits claimed during each calendar year, and the portion issued as refunds.

(2) In order to protect the presumption of confidentiality provided for in section 77-6609, the Department of Economic Development and the Department of Revenue shall report all information in an aggregate form to prevent, to the extent reasonably possible, information being attributable to any particular eligible business, except as provided in subdivision (1)(h) of this section.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 76;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 14.
July 18, 2026